Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Article 1. State Sales Tax
The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 186 § 2, effective July 1, 2019, repealed (a)(xii), which read: “"This article" means W.S.

39-15-101

through

39-15-111

;”.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in the introductory language of (a)(vii) substituted “transfer of title or possession” for “transfer of possession”; and added (a)(lxvii).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1998, ch. 77, § 1, amended paragraph (a)(iv) of
W.S. 39-6-402, which was repealed by
Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 4. The amendment to
§ 39-6-402(a)(iv) by ch. 77 was subsequently incorporated into this section, as enacted by
Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

Laws 2007, ch. 10, § 1, and
Laws 2007, ch. 140, § 1, each added a paragraph (xxxix) to subsection (a). The paragraph added by ch. 140, § 1, has been redesignated as paragraph (a)(xli) at the direction of the legislative service office.

Ambiguity.

—

Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 39-15-101(a)(vii)(N) was not ambiguous because the provision could be applied in a way that did not produce a “hollow” result, as the provision’s tax exemption had effect if applied to the sale of a business entity’s assets and plainly conditioned exclusion from the definition of “sale” on the purchase of at least 80% of the value of all of a business entity’s assets located in Wyoming. Delcon Partners LLC v. Wyo. Dep't of Revenue, 2019 WY 106, 450 P.3d 682,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(Wyo. 2019).

Vendor. —

Online travel companies were vendors under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 39-15-101(a)(xv) where they contracted with hotels, had the authority to rent rooms at a price they established, under their hotel contracts they had the right to markup the room price, and dissatisfied customers had to seek a refund from them. Travelocity.com, LP v. Wyo. Dep't of Revenue, 2014 WY 43, 329 P.3d 131,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 2014).

Department of Revenue had the burden of showing that renting campsites at a county fair for one week per year, at $25 per campsite, was a taxable event. The Board of Equalization’s determination that the county fair board was not a “vendor” as defined by this section and therefore not required to impose an excise tax was supported by the record, and the Board’s conclusion that the Department failed to meet its burden of proof was not arbitrary or capricious. State Dep’t of State Dep't of Revenue v. Bd. of County Comm'rs, 2019 WY 7, 432 P.3d 920,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 2019).

Repossession is considered as “sale” upon which sales tax is due;

otherwise, subsection (a)(iii)(J) (now (a)(vii)(J)) would be superfluous. Rock Springs Ford Nissan v. State Bd. of Equalization, 890 P.2d 1100,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1995).

Transacting business in state. —

A foreign powder company was not transacting business in Wyoming so as to be subject to the sales tax merely because it sent service men into the state to call on the trade, do underground demonstration work, and handle investigation of complaints. Hercules Powder Co. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 66 Wyo. 268, 208 P.2d 1096,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1949).

Sales tax.—

Buyer did not breach a contract to sell a mobile home because the buyer’s obligation to pay sales tax was contingent on tax being due, but tax was not due since only the seller’s first ownership of the home was taxed. Larson v. Burton Constr., Inc., 2018 WY 74, 421 P.3d 538,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 2018).

Taxpayer’s purchase of a business’s tangible and intangible assets was not exempt from sales tax because (1) an exemption only applied to a sale of at least 80% of the total value of a business’s assets, both tangible and intangible, and (2) the taxpayer only purchased 28% of such assets. Delcon Partners LLC v. Wyo. Dep't of Revenue, 2019 WY 106, 450 P.3d 682,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(Wyo. 2019).

Railroad construction ballast not taxable. —

Sales tax did not need to be paid by railroad company on purchases of “construction” ballast, since the purchases constituted destination sales, and a taxable event occurs only when title or possession of tangible personal property passes to the purchaser in State ex rel. State Department of Revenue v. Union Pac. R.R. Co., 2003 WY 54, 67 P.3d 1176,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 2003).

Applied

in

Wyoming v. Sunrise Constr. Co., 39 B.R. 668 (D. Wyo. 1984); Allied-Signal, Inc. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 813 P.2d 214,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 104

(Wyo. 1991).

Quoted

in

In re Sunrise Constr. Co., 32 B.R. 257, 1983 Bankr. LEXIS 5651 (Bankr. D. Wyo. 1983); Hutchison v. Hill, 3 P.3d 242,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 69

, 83 A.L.R.5th 819 (Wyo. 2000); State v. Buggy Bath Unlimited, Inc., 2001 WY 27, 18 P.3d 1182,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 2001); PacifiCorp, Inc. v. Dep't of Revenue, 2017 WY 106, 401 P.3d 905,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 112

(Wyo. 2017).

Stated

in

Buehner Block Co. v. Wyoming Dep't of Revenue, 2006 WY 90, 139 P.3d 1150,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(2006).

Cited

in

State v. Powder River Coal Co., 2004 WY 54, 90 P.3d 1158,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 65

(2004).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Transfer of Possession as a Taxable Sale,” see 8 Wyo. L.J. 137.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Sale by wholly owned subsidiary to parent corporation, or vice versa, as within retail sales tax or similar statute, 64 ALR2d 769.

Redemption of trading stamps or the like for merchandise as sale at retail within taxing statute, 80 ALR2d 1221.

Automatic vending machine sales, 91 ALR2d 1138.

Sales or use tax on motor vehicle purchased out of state, 45 ALR3d 1270.

Sales and use taxes on leased tangible personal property, 2 ALR4th 859.

Cable television equipment or services as subject to sales or use tax, 5 ALR4th 754.